Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 17A Control of HIV

Cross references.

Child committing delinquent act constituting AIDS transmission crime including testing and reporting, §

15-11-603

.

AIDS transmitting crimes and required reporting, §

17-10-15

.

Confidential nature of AIDS information, §

24-12-20

.

Disclosure of AIDS confidential information, §

24-12-21

.

Methods for selection of blood donors and collection of blood, §

31-22-5

.

HIV tests, §§

31-22-9.1

,

31-22-9.2

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and its causative agent, including Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV), pose a grave threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state. In the absence of any effective vaccination or treatment for this disease, it threatens almost certain death to all who contract it. The disease is largely transmitted through sexual contacts and intravenous drug use, not through casual contact, and, while deadly, is therefore preventable. The key component of the fight against AIDS is education. Through public education and counseling our citizens can learn how the disease is transmitted and, thus, how to protect themselves and prevent its spread. The Department of Human Resources is encouraged to continue its efforts to educate all Georgians about the disease, its causative agent, and its means of transmission. In addition, voluntary testing should be encouraged for anyone who feels at risk of infection. While education, counseling, and voluntary testing are vital to the elimination of this epidemic, other measures are needed to protect the health of our citizens, and it is the intention of the General Assembly to enact such measures in the exercise of its police powers in order to deal with AIDS and HIV infection.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Disease Surveillance and Control, Subject 511-2-5.

Law reviews.

For note, “ ‘Rabbit’ Hunting in the Supreme Court:
The Constitutionality of State Prohibitions of Sex Toy Sales Following Lawrence v. Texas,” see 44 Ga. L. Rev. 245 (2009).

For comment, “The Pursuit of Happiness (and Sexual Freedom): Lawrence v. Texas, Morality Legislation & the Sandy Springs Obscenity Statute,” see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1087 (2015).

31-17A-1.
HIV deemed dangerous to public health.

Any term used in this chapter and defined in Code Section 31-22-9.1 shall have the meaning provided for such term in Code Section 31-22-9.1.

HIV and the degenerative diseases associated with it are declared to be contagious, infectious, communicable, and extremely dangerous to the public health.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-17A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 7.

31-17A-2.
Examination of infected persons; administration of HIV test.

The authorized agent or agents of the Department of Public Health are directed and empowered, when in their judgment it is necessary to protect the public health, to make examinations of persons infected or suspected of being infected with HIV and to administer an HIV test with the consent of the person being tested. In the event the person infected or suspected of being infected with HIV refuses to consent to the administration of an HIV test, the authorized agent or agents of the Department of Public Health are authorized to petition the court for an order authorizing the administration of an HIV test pursuant to the procedure set forth in Code Section 31-17A-3.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-17A-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-17A-3.
Refusal to consent to test; procedure.

If a person refuses to consent to an HIV test, as provided in Code Section 31-17A-2, the Department of Public Health may file a civil complaint with the superior court of the county of the residence of the person refusing the test. The complaint shall allege with specificity the basis for the allegations which the department believes support the conclusion that the person is infected with HIV, as well as the scope, nature, and threat to the public health created thereby, and the proposed plan to be adopted to protect the public health in the event the court orders the administration of the HIV test and the person is found to be an HIV infected person. The person against whom the complaint is filed shall be represented by counsel, and, in the event the person against whom the complaint is filed cannot afford counsel, counsel shall be appointed by the court.

The superior court shall hear the complaint on an expedited basis without a jury. All proceedings before the court shall be sealed.

If after consideration of the evidence, the court finds clear and convincing evidence that the person is reasonably likely to be infected with HIV and that there is a compelling need to protect the public health, the court may order the person to submit to an HIV test, shall retain jurisdiction to render such orders as are appropriate to effectuate that order, and, in the event the person so tested is determined to be infected with HIV, to require such procedures to protect the public health consistent with the least restrictive alternative which is available within the limits of state funds specifically appropriated therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-17A-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-17A-4.
Pilot program for preexposure prophylaxis drug assistance or services.

The department shall conduct a three-year pilot program for the purpose of providing preexposure prophylaxis drug assistance or services to persons who have tested negative for the HIV infection but who have risk factors that expose them to HIV. The pilot program shall be conducted in counties identified by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention as at risk of outbreaks of HIV as a result of a high rate of opioid related use or in such other counties as determined by the department. In designing the pilot program, the department may obtain advisement and consultation from county health departments in counties in this state that have an existing preexposure prophylaxis drug assistance program or related services.

The pilot program shall provide assistance for preexposure prophylaxis medications approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration and for medical, laboratory, and outreach costs incurred in treatment. The department shall establish benchmark data at the beginning of the pilot program which shall be compared to data at the end of such pilot program to measure the effectiveness of such program. Participants in the pilot program shall be subject to clinical guidelines established by the department consistent with guidance from the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, which may include, but not be limited to, regular HIV testing, education information, sexually transmitted infection testing, and supportive services. Education information may be provided in writing, orally, or both.

The department shall be authorized to solicit and accept grants of funding or in-kind services for use in conducting the pilot program.

The department is authorized to establish such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the pilot program.

No later than December 31, 2022, the department shall submit a detailed written report on the implementation and effectiveness of the pilot program to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Health and Human Services and the Senate Health and Human Services Committee. Such report shall also include recommendations as to expansion of the pilot program state wide.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-17A-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 199, § 1/HB 290; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 31/HB 497.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “state wide” for “state-wide” at the end of the last sentence of subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 199, § 2/HB 290, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Code section becomes effective only when funds are specifically appropriated for purposes of the Act in an Appropriations Act making specific reference to that Act. Funds were
appropriated during the 2020 session of the General Assembly.